Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2422
Projects other than power projects; directors; file certificate; contents.

The directors shall file with the Secretary of State a certificate signed by them setting forth (1) the names of all the proposed participating municipalities, (2) the name and residence of each of the directors so far as known to them, (3) a certified copy of each of the ordinances or resolutions of the participating municipalities determining the need for such an agency, (4) a certified copy of the proceedings of each municipality evidencing the director's right to office, and (5) the name of the agency. The certificate shall be subscribed and sworn to by such directors before an officer or officers authorized by the laws of the state to administer and certify oaths.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB199, § 3.